Connecticut, session 2026, SB00354.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2 2027, the Labor Commissioner shall employ not fewer than the number
3 of employees at the Unemployment Insurance Benefits Division within
4 the Labor Department employed at such division on September 30, 2025.
5 (b) Not later than July 1, 2027, the Labor Commissioner shall hire an
6 additional twenty-five employees to such division for the purpose of
7 processing and administering unemployment benefit claims.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a), "not less than the" was changed to "not fewer than the"
for clarity.
LAB Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 1 of 1